Delaware, session 153, SB112.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. The Delaware State Police Training Academy is hereby renamed the âColonel James L. Ford, Jr. State Police Training Academy.â Section 2. Appropriate signs shall be placed on the training academy grounds to reflect it is the âColonel James L. Ford, Jr. State Police Training Academy.â